Utah statutes.
11-14-312.   Prior bonds validated -- Exceptions.
All bonds issued by any local political subdivision before May 1, 2006, and
all proceedings had in the authorization and issuance of them are hereby
validated, ratified, and confirmed; and all such bonds are declared to
constitute legally binding obligations in accordance with their terms.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or validate any bonds,
the legality of which is being contested as of May 1, 2006.
